Tennessee, session 114, HB1944.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-5-504, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(d)
(1) The department shall test for the presence of sickle cell trait in each
newborn born on or after the effective date of this act.
(2) If the test results are positive for sickle cell trait, then the department
shall notify the parent or legal guardian of the newborn tested as soon as
practicable.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1944
010763
- 1 -